Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 27-103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 27-103. A. A public school or school district shall


not be a member of any school athletic association unless that


association has adopted a written policy that requires the


following:


1. All records of the association to be made accessible


consistent with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Records Act;



Req. No. 2546 Page 1


2. All meetings of the association to be open and conducted in


a manner consistent with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting


Act, including specifically the notice and agenda, voting, and


executive session requirements; and


3. An annual financial audit and a compliance audit of all


funds of the association in accordance with the auditing standards


set forth in the Oklahoma Public School Audit Law. In addition, the


association shall have performance audits conducted of the


operations of the association. A performance audit shall be


conducted no later than December 31, 2014, and by December 31 every


five (5) years thereafter;


4. Submission of rules or amendments to rules governing


interscholastic activities or contests to the Legislature for review


pursuant to the provisions of subsection B of this section; and


5. A student who transfers to a public school or school


district in which the student is not a resident, according to the


provisions of the Education Open Transfer Act, is allowed to


participate in interscholastic activities or contests offered by the


receiving school district upon enrollment.


B. 1. Upon adoption of any rules or amendments to rules


governing interscholastic activities or contests, the school


athletic association shall submit the adopted rules or amendments to


the rules to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate or a designee



Req. No. 2546 Page 2


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives or a designee prior


to the last thirty (30) days of the legislative session.


2. By adoption of a joint resolution, the Legislature shall


approve or disapprove in whole or in part the rules or amendments to


rules, provided that such joint resolution becomes law in accordance


with Section 11 of Article VI of the Oklahoma Constitution. If the


joint resolution is vetoed by the Governor in accordance with


Section 11 of Article VI of the Oklahoma Constitution and the veto


is not overridden, the rules or amendments to rules shall be deemed


approved. If the Legislature fails to adopt a joint resolution


within thirty (30) legislative days following submission of the


rules or amendments to rules, they shall be deemed approved.


3. If the rules or amendments to rules are disapproved in whole


or in part, the school athletic association may adopt new rules or


amendments to rules and submit them for legislative review as


provided for in this subsection. The association shall continue to


implement its current rules in place until the new rules or


amendments to rules have been reviewed by the Legislature and


approved as provided for in this section.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 8-103.2, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 2546 Page 3


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2546 EB 1/15/2026 8:31:20 AM









































Req. No. 2546 Page 4